Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201783-971
Director of Correctional Services; military force necessary to carry out punishment; inform Governor.

Whenever the Director of Correctional Services shall deem the presence of a military force necessary to carry into effect the provisions of sections 83-964 and 83-969, he or she shall make the fact known to the Governor of the state, who is hereby authorized to call out so much of the military force of the state as in his or her judgment may be necessary for the purpose.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 29-2535;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 83-971 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.